North Dakota, session 69, HB1357.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 15.1-06-06 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. To obtain certification that a public school is approved, the superintendent of the district in
which the school is located shall submit to the superintendent of public instruction a
compliance report verifying that:
a. Each classroom teacher is licensed to teach by the education standards and practices
board or approved to teach by the education standards and practices board;
b. Each classroom teacher is teaching only in those course areas or fields for which the
teacher is licensed or for which the teacher has received an exception under section
15.1-09-57;
c. The school meets all curricular requirements set forth in chapter 15.1-21;
d. The school participates in and meets the requirements of a review process that is:
(1) Designed to improve student achievement through a continuous cycle of
improvement; and
(2) Approved by the superintendent of public instruction;
e. The physical school plant has been inspected by the state fire marshal or the state fire
marshal's designee in accordance with section 15.1-06-09 and:
(1) Has no unremedied deficiency; or
(2) Has deficiencies that have been addressed in a plan of correction which was
submitted to and approved by the state fire marshal or the state fire marshal's
designee;
f. All individuals hired after June 30, 2011, and having unsupervised contact with students
at the school, have:
(1) Undergone a criminal history background check requested by the employing school
district; or
(2) Undergone a criminal history background check in order to be licensed by the
education standards and practices board or by any other state licensing board; and
g. The school uses North Dakota eTranscripts, or an alternative information system
designated by the information technology department in collaboration with the
superintendent of public instruction, to generate official transcripts.

H. B. NO. 1357 - PAGE 2
h. The school executed a data sharing agreement with the department under sections
15.1 - 07 - 25.3 and 15.1 - 07 - 33 .
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-07-25.3 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended
and reenacted as follows:
15.1-07-25.3. Protection of student data - School district policy.
1. The board of eacha school district shall adopt a policy regarding the protection of student
data.
2. The policy must require:
a. Require that permission be obtained from the board before any student data is shared
with an individual who is not a school district employee or shared with any other entity.
This provision does not apply to the sharing of data with a student's parent or to the
sharing of data, if required as otherwise authorized by law.
b. Permit a school district to share student data with the state entity managing a student
information system if the school district and the state entity have entered a data sharing
agreement, subject to federal and state privacy laws. The data sharing agreement must
include a clause that designates the department as an authorized representative of the
school district under the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974
[20 U.S.C . 1232G] and title 34 Code of Federal Regulations par t 99 for purposes of the
statewide longitudinal data system.
3. The policy must require the school district superintendent to compile:
a. A list of all individuals with whom, and entities with which, student data is shared; and
b. A list, by title, of all school district personnel who have access to student data.
4. A school district shall make copies of the policy available upon request.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 15.1-07-33 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
15.1-07-33. Student information system - Exemption.
1. Notwithstanding any other technology requirements imposed by the superintendent of public
instruction or the information technology department, each school district shall implement the
state student information system administered by the information technology department and,
use it as its principal student information system, and enter a data sharing agreement with the
department of public instruction, subject to federal and state privacy laws and section
15.1 - 07 - 25.3 . Each school district shall use a state course code, assigned by the department
of public instruction, to identify all local classes in the state student information system.
2. The statewide longitudinal data system committeesuperintendent of public instruction may
exempt a school district from having to implement and utilize the state student information
system if the school district demonstrates that:
a. The district has acquired and is using a student information system determined to be
compatible with the statewide longitudinal data system; or
b. In accordance with requirements of the bureau of Indian education, the district has
acquired and is utilizing a student information system that is determined to be
comparable by the superintendent.
SECTION 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.

H. B. NO. 1357 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1357.
House Vote: Yeas 93 Nays 0 Absent 1
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State